src/verbLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON Imperative2_LVReq_Obj
+2Sg/1Sg:мак ImpClitics ;
+Default/1:мизь ImpClitics ;


LEXICON Optative1
!Optative
  Optative1_A ;

!Verbs1 comes here
LEXICON Optative1_A
+Gr2000+1Sg:^О1зан Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Sg:^О1зат Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Sg:^О1зО1 Clitics ;
+Gr2000+1Pl:^О1зтано Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Pl:^О1зтадо Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Pl:^О1зт Clitics ;
+1Pl:^О1стано Clitics ;
+2Pl:^О1стадо Clitics ;
+3Pl:^О1ст Clitics ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Optative1_A_Obj ;

LEXICON Optative1_A_Obj
+Gr2000+1Sg/2Sg:^О1здан Clitics ;
+1Sg/2Sg:^О1зтан Clitics ;
+1Sg/3Sg:^О1са Clitics ;
+Gr2000+1Sg/3Sg:^О1зса Clitics ;
+Dial+1Sg/3Sg:^О1сан Clitics ;
+Gr2000+1Sg/3Pl:^О1зсынь Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Sg/1Sg:^О1змак Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Sg/3Sg:^О1зсак Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Sg/3Pl:^О1зсыть Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Sg/1Sg:^О1змам Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Sg/2Sg:^О1нзат Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Sg/3Sg:^О1зсы Clitics ;
+3Sg/3Sg:^О1ссО1 Clitics ;
!+3Sg/3Sg:^О1сазо Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Sg/3Pl:^О1зсынзе Clitics ;
+Gr2000+1Pl/3:^О1зсынек Clitics ;
+Gr2000+2Pl/3:^О1зсынк Clitics ;
+Gr2000+3Pl/3:^О1зсызь Clitics ;
+Gr2000+Default/1:^О1змизь Clitics ;
+Gr2000+Default/2:^О1зтадызь Clitics ;




LEXICON ImpClitics
+NoClitic: # ;
+ClitGa:^Г1а # ;
+ClitGaka:^Г1ака # ;
+ClitGakaya:^Г1акая # ;
+ClitGaya:^Г1ая # ;
+ClitGayaty:^Г1аять # ;
+ClitGayatya:^Г1аятя # ;
+ClitGak:^Г1ак # ;
+ClitA:^а # ;
+ClitA:^ая # ;
+ClitKA:^ака # ;
!+ClitKa:^ка # ;
!+ClitKaka:^кака # ;
!+ClitKakaya:^какая # ;
!+ClitKaya:^кая # ;
!+ClitKayaty:^каять # ;
!+ClitKayatya:^каятя # ;

LEXICON VerbsPresPrt_1
+Deverbal+PresPrtLong+NConsStem:^Ы2ця Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+PresPrtMedium+NConsStem:^Ы2й Nouns1 ;
+Deverbal+PresPrtShort+NVowStem:^Ы2 Nouns3 ;
+Conneg:^О1К3 Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Deverbals_1_ReqVow

+Deverbal+Noun+NVowStem:^О1мА1 Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+Oblig+NVowStem:^О1ма Tenses1 ;
+Deverbal+Noun+NVowStem:^О1мка Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+mOInf+Loc:^О1мО1 Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+msInf+Ill:^О1мс Tenses1 ;
+Deverbal+mstOInf+Ela:^О1мстО1 Possessives1 ;
+Deverbal+msOInf+Ine:^О1мсО1 Possessives1 ;
+Deverbal+mgaInf+Prol:^О1мга Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mdOInf+Abl:^О1мдО1 Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mOInf+Abl:^О1мО1^дО1 Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mOInf+Ill:^О1мО1^зО1 Possessives2 ;
+Deverbal+ZPrt+ConsStem:^О1зь Nouns1S ; !!
+Deverbal+GenPrt+ConsStem:^О1нь Tenses1 ;

+Deverbal+GenPrt+VowStem:^О1нсе Nouns3 ;

LEXICON Deverbals_1_NoReqVow

+Dial+Deverbal+mOInf+Loc:^мО1 Nouns3 ;
+Dial+Deverbal+mksInf+Transl:^мекс Tenses1 ;
!!This one was marked on 2006-12-01
+Dial+Deverbal+msInf+Transl:^мО1^ксУ4 Tenses1 ;
!!This one was marked on 2006-12-01
+Dial+Deverbal+mOInf+Abl:^мО1^дО1 Possessives1 ;
!!This one was marked on 2006-12-01
+Dial+Deverbal+mOInf+Ill:^мО1^зО1 Possessives2 ;

!!!!!!!!!
!!Verbs2 and Verbs3
LEXICON Deverbals_2

+Deverbal+Noun+NVowStem:^О1мА1 Nouns3;
+Deverbal+Oblig+NVowStem:^О1ма Tenses1 ;
+Deverbal+Noun+NVowStem:^О1мка Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+mOInf+Loc:^О1мО1 Nouns3 ;
+Deverbal+msInf+Ill:^О1мс Tenses1 ;
+Deverbal+mstOInf+Ela:^О1мстО1 Possessives1 ;
+Deverbal+mgaInf+Prol:^О1мга Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mdOInf+Abl:^О1мдО1 Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mOInf+Abl:^О1мО1^дО1 Possessives1 ;
!!Marked 2006-12-01
+Deverbal+mOInf+Ill:^О1мО1^зО1 Possessives2 ;
+Deverbal+ZPrt+ConsStem:^О1зь Nouns1S ; !!
+Deverbal+GenPrt+ConsStem:^О1нь Tenses1 ;
+Deverbal+GenPrt+VowStem:^О1нсе Nouns3 ;

!!This one was marked on 2006-12-01
+Dial+Deverbal+msInf+Transl:^О1мО1^кс Tenses1 ;

!!2011-03-26
!!!!
!!Ready to join the nouns
!

LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension
!!!!Secondary declension
!!Indefinite declension
+Abe+Indef:^втО1мО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Abl+Indef:^дО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Comp+Indef:^О1шка Nouns3-1 ;
+Ela+Indef:^стО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Ine+Indef:^сО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Prol+Indef:^Г2а Nouns3-1 ;
+Transl+Indef:^О1кс Nouns1S-1 ;

!!Definite Plural declension
+Pl.DefPl+Abe:^тне^втеме Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abl:^тне^де Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Comp:^тне^шка Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ela:^тне^стэ Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ine:^тне^сэ Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Prol:^тне^ва Nouns3-1 ;
+Pl.DefPl+Transl:^тне^кс Nouns1S-1 ;

!!
+Gen+OrthOld+SOD:^О1нсе Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+OrthMorph+SOD:^О1ньсе Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+OrthPhon+SOD:^О1нце Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthMorph+DefSg+SOD:^О1нт^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Nouns1-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg+SOD:^О1нУ4^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg+SOD:^О1тУ4^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg+SOD:^О1нзО1^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl+SOD:^О1нО1к^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl+SOD:^О1нк^се Nouns3-1 ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl+SOD:^О1ст^се Nouns3-1 ;


+Abe:^втО1мО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Abl:^дО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Comp:^О1шка Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ela:^стО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Ine:^сО1 Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Prol:^Г2а Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;
+Transl:^О1кс Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns-Secondary-declension_Poss

!!Possessive declension
+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Nouns3-1 ;
+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Nouns1-1 ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Nouns1-1 ;



LEXICON Nouns1 
 Nouns1-1 ;
+N1: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;



LEXICON Nouns1-1
+N1+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1: Nouns_Voiceless ; 
+N1: Nouns1_A ;

LEXICON Nouns1S 
 Nouns1S-1 ;
+N1S: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns1S-1 
+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N1S+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_ReqVow ;
+N1S: Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow ;


!!SETTING OFF N2 because it does not appear in verbs?!
!!!
!LEXICON Nouns2I 
! Nouns2I-1 ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2I-1
!+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
!+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
!+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2I-y
! Nouns2I-y-1 ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem:ь Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2I-y-1
!+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
!+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
!+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:ь Tenses-Abs-1 ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem:ь Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2I-j 
! Nouns2I-j-1 ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem:й Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2I-j-1 
!+N2I+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:е Tenses-NomSg ;
!+N2I+Abs+LVStem:е Tenses-Abs ;
!+N2I+Abs+NoLVStem:й Tenses-Abs-1 ;
!+N2I+NoLVStem:й Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2I+LVStem:е Nouns2-a ;
!
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2U 
! Nouns2U-1 ;
!+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!+N2U+NoLVStem: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;
!
!
!LEXICON Nouns2U-1
!+N2U+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf:о Tenses-NomSg ;
!+N2U+Abs+LVStem:о Tenses-Abs ;
!+N2U+Abs+NoLVStem: Tenses-Abs-1 ;
!+N2U+NoLVStem: Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns_Voiceless ;
!+N2U+LVStem:о Nouns2-a ;
!!!!!!


LEXICON Nouns3 
 Nouns3-1 ;
+N3: Nouns-Secondary-declension ;


LEXICON Nouns3-1
+N3+IndefNomSg+ZeroSuf: Tenses-NomSg ;
+N3+Abs: Tenses-Abs ;
+N3: Nouns_Voiceless ;
+N3: Nouns2-a ;




LEXICON Indef-DefSg-Poss
+Indef: Tenses-Obl ;
+DefSg:^О1нть Clitics ;
+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Nouns_Voiceless
Nouns_Pl ;
Nouns_Shibilant ;


LEXICON Nouns_Shibilant
+Ill+Indef:^с Clitics ;
+Ine:^сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:^стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

LEXICON Root
адядо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Pl:адядо ImpClitics ;
адя+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg:адя ImpClitics ;
адя+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:адяка ImpClitics ;
азёдо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Pl:азёдо ImpClitics ;
азё+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg:азё ImpClitics ;
азё+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:азёка ImpClitics ;
вадо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Pl:вадо ImpClitics ;
ва+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg:ва ImpClitics ;
пандядо+Verb+Imp:пандядо ImpClitics ;
пандя+Verb+Imp:пандя ImpClitics ;
ужодо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Pl:ужодо ImpClitics ;
ужо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg:ужо ImpClitics ;
ужо+Prt+Verb+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:ужока ImpClitics ;
